Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 29
SAFETY REGULATIONS

34-29-101 to 34-29-136. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article repealed, p. 1199, § 10, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 10 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For present provisions relating to health and safety, see articles 20 to 25 and 31 of this title.